California, session 20252026, SB241.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 87359.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:87359.2. (a) The instructor of record for a course of instruction shall be a person who meets the minimum qualifications to serve as a faculty member teaching credit instruction or a faculty member teaching noncredit instruction established pursuant to Section 87356 or the qualifications to serve as a faculty member established pursuant to Section 87359.(b) A community college instructor, librarian, counselor, student personnel worker, supervisor, administrator, chief administrative officer, extended opportunity programs and services worker, disabled students programs and services worker, apprenticeship instructor, or supervisor of health shall be a person who meets the minimum qualifications to serve in that position established pursuant to Sections 87355 and 87356 or the qualifications to serve in that position established pursuant to Section 87359.(c) This section does not prohibit community college staff from using artificial intelligence tools to assist in the operations of a community college or in providing services to community college students.